Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1456
New manufacturer-dealer agreement; notice requirements.

(1) Prior to entering a new manufacturer-dealer agreement to sell the same line-make, a dealer shall provide written notice to each manufacturer and distributor with which the dealer has a manufacturer-dealer agreement.

(2) Such written notice shall:

(a) Be provided to the headquarters of the manufacturer or distributor at least thirty days prior to entering the new manufacturer-dealer agreement;

(b) Specify that the dealer will be entering a new manufacturer-dealer agreement;

(c) Specify the line-make that is the subject of the new manufacturer-dealer agreement; and

(d) Specify the length of time that the new manufacturer-dealer agreement will be effective.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 15.
October 1, 2026